Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3621
Eligibility to become member state; when compact effective; amendments to compact.

(a) Any state is eligible to become a member state of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact.

(b) The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no less than seven states. Thereafter, it shall become effective and binding on a state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state.

(c) The governors of nonmember states, or their designees, shall be invited to participate in the activities of the interstate commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states.

(d) The interstate commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the interstate commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 21.